Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 7 Retail Licenses
3-7-7.
Class B license. [Effective December 1, 2022.]

A retailer’s Class B license is issued only to a licensed bona fide tavern keeper or victualer whose tavern or victualing house may be open for business and regularly patronized at least from nine o’clock (9:00) a.m. to seven o’clock (7:00) p.m. provided no beverage is sold or served after one o’clock (1:00) a.m., nor before six o’clock (6:00) a.m. Local licensing boards may fix an earlier closing time within their jurisdiction, at their discretion. The East Greenwich town council may, in its discretion, issue full and limited Class B licenses which may not be transferred, but which shall revert to the town of East Greenwich if not renewed by the holder. The Cumberland town council may, in its discretion, issue full and limited Class B licenses which may not be transferred to another person or entity, or to another location, but which shall revert to the town of Cumberland if not renewed by the holder.

The license authorizes the holder to keep for sale and sell beverages including beer in cans, at retail at the place described and to deliver them for consumption on the premises or place where sold, but only at tables or a lunch bar where food is served. It also authorizes the charging of a cover, minimum, or door charge. The amount of the cover, or minimum, or door charge shall be posted at the entrance of the establishments in a prominent place.

A holder of a Class B license will be permitted to sell, with take-out food orders, up to two (2) seven hundred fifty millimeter (750 ml) bottles of wine or the equivalent volume of wine in smaller factory sealed containers, or seventy-two ounces (72 oz.) of mixed wine-based drinks or single-serving wine in containers sealed in such a way as to prevent re-opening without obvious evidence that the seal was removed or broken, one hundred forty-four ounces (144 oz.) of beer or mixed beverages in original factory sealed containers, and one hundred forty-four ounces (144 oz.) of draft beer or seventy-two ounces (72 oz.) of mixed beverages containing not more than nine ounces (9 oz.) of distilled spirits in growlers, bottles, or other containers sealed in such a way as to prevent re-opening without obvious evidence that the seal was removed or broken, provided such sales shall be made in accordance with § 1.4.10 of the department of business regulation (DBR) liquor control administration regulations,

230-RICR-30-10-1

, and any other DBR regulations. A Class B license holder shall not sell alcoholic beverages under the provisions of this subsection for a lower price than what is charged for the same beverage for consumption on the premises.

Delivery of alcoholic beverages with food from a Class B licensee is prohibited.

The provisions of subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii) of this section shall remain permanent and any sunset provision pursuant to P.L. 2021, ch. 129, § 3 or P.L. 2021, ch. 130, § 3 shall be void.

Holders of licenses are not permitted to hold dances within the licensed premises, unless proper permits have been properly obtained from the local licensing authorities.

Any holder of a Class B license may, upon the approval of the local licensing board and for the additional payment of two hundred dollars ($200) to five hundred dollars ($500), open for business at twelve o’clock (12:00) p.m. and on Fridays and Saturdays and the night before legal state holidays may close at two o’clock (2:00) a.m. All requests for a two o’clock (2:00) a.m. license shall be advertised by the local licensing board in a newspaper having a circulation in the county where the establishment applying for the license is located.

A holder of a retailer’s Class B license is allowed to erect signs advertising his or her business and products sold on the premises, including neon signs, and is allowed to light those signs during all lawful business hours, including Sundays and holidays.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) and/or §

3-7-16.4

, a holder of a retail class B and/or class ED license may apply to the municipality in which the licensee is located for a permit to conduct a so-called “Lock-In Event”, under the following conditions:

A “Lock-In Event” is defined as an event where a specified group of individuals are permitted to remain in a licensed premises after closing hours including, but not limited to, the hours of 1:00 a.m. to 6:00 a.m.

A Lock-In Event must have the approval of the municipal licensing authority pursuant to a permit issued for each such event, subject to such conditions as may attach to the permit. The fee for the permit shall be not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100). The granting or denial of a Lock-In Event permit shall be in the sole discretion of the municipal licensing authority and there shall be no appeal from the denial of such a permit.

During the entire period of any Lock-In Event, all alcoholic beverages must be secured in place or removed from the public portion of the premises and secured to the satisfaction of the municipality issuing the Lock-In Event permit.

During the Lock-In Event, the establishment shall be exclusively occupied by the Lock-In Event participants and no other patrons shall be admitted to the premises who are not participants. It shall be a condition of the permit that participants shall not be admitted more than thirty (30) minutes after the permitted start time of the Lock-In Event, except in the event of unforeseen travel delays, nor permitted to re-enter the event if they leave the licensed premises.

As part of the Lock-In Event, food shall be served.

The municipal licensing authority may, in its sole discretion, require the presence of a police detail, for some or all of the event, and the number of officers required, if any, shall be determined by the municipality as part of the process of issuing the Lock-In Event permit. The licensee shall be solely responsible for the cost of any such required police detail.

The Pawtucket city council may, in its discretion, issue full and limited Class B licenses which may not be transferred to another person or entity, or to another location, but which shall revert to the city of Pawtucket if not renewed by the holder. This legislation shall not affect any Class B license holders whose licenses were issued by the Pawtucket city council with the right to transfer.

The annual license fee for a tavern keeper shall be four hundred dollars ($400) to two thousand dollars ($2,000), and for a victualer the license fee shall be four hundred dollars ($400) to two thousand dollars ($2,000). In towns with a population of less than two thousand five hundred (2,500) inhabitants, as determined by the last census taken under the authority of the United States or the state, the fee for each retailer’s Class B license shall be determined by the town council, but shall in no case be less than three hundred dollars ($300) annually. If the applicant requests it in his or her application, any retailer’s Class B license may be issued limiting the sale of beverages on the licensed premises to malt and vinous beverages containing not more than twenty percent (20%) alcohol by volume, and the fee for that limited Class B license shall be two hundred dollars ($200) to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) annually. The fee for any Class B license shall in each case be prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year.

Upon the approval and designation of a district or districts within its city or town by the local licensing board, the local licensing board may issue to any holder of a Class B license or a Class ED license, an extended hours permit to extend closing hours on Thursdays, Fridays and Saturdays, the night before a legal state holiday or such other days as determined by the local board, for one hour past such license holder’s legal closing time as established by the license holder’s license or licenses including, but not limited to, those issued pursuant to subsection (a)(4) of this section. The extended hours permit shall not permit the sale of alcohol during the extended one-hour period and shall prohibit the admittance of new patrons in the establishment during the extended one-hour period. The designation of such district(s) shall be for a duration of not less than six (6) months. Prior to designating any such district, the local licensing authority shall hold a hearing on the proposed designation. The proposed designation shall include the boundaries of the proposed district, the applicable days for the extended hours, and the duration of the designation and the conditions imposed. The proposed designation shall be advertised at least once per week for three (3) weeks prior to the hearing in a newspaper in general circulation in the city or town. The city or town will establish an application process for an extended hours permit for such license holder and may adopt rules and regulations to administer the permit.

The licensee shall offer to the public, in conjunction with the sale of alcoholic beverages, the opportunity to purchase and consume food to be served on the premises in the same area designated for the sale and consumption of alcoholic beverages. These foods shall be offered for sale during all times that alcoholic beverages are sold and consumed on the licensed premises, unless the local licensing board grants permission to the licensee to stop the sale of food after ten o’clock (10:00) p.m., with such permission subject to revocation by the local licensing board at any time for any cause.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 1; P.L. 1941, ch. 1037, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 7, § 11; P.L. 2004, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 129, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 130, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 3, § 2, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 4, § 2, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 33, § 1, effective December 1, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 34, § 1, effective December 1, 2022.

3-7-7.1.
Class B-H license.

A retailer’s Class B-H license shall be issued only to a licensed hotel. The license authorizes the holder to keep for sale and sell beverages in containers of a minimum capacity of fifty milliliters (50 ml.) or one and seven tenths ounces (1.7 oz). The beverages shall be sold and served only in the room of a registered hotel guest. The beverages may be served in the hotel room at least from nine o’clock (9:00) a.m. to seven o’clock (7:00) p.m. No beverages shall be served in the hotel room after one o’clock (1:00) a.m., nor before six o’clock (6:00) a.m. The beverages may be sold only in the room of the registered hotel guest at any time.

A Class B and B-H liquor license may be issued for the same licensed hotel, notwithstanding the provisions of §

3-5-9

.

The annual fee for this license shall be one hundred dollars ($100) to five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 535, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 7, § 11; P.L. 2004, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 410, § 1.

3-7-7.2.
Manufacturer’s brewpub license — Class B-M.

A manufacturer’s brewpub Class B-M license shall be issued only to a holder of a manufacturer’s license as described in §

3-6-1

. The license shall not authorize the retail sale of beverages from any location other than at the location stated in the manufacturer’s license for the manufacture of beverages.

The license shall not authorize the retail sale of beverages from any location other than as provided in §

3-6-1.2

.

The holder of a license issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be otherwise barred from application for a Class B license, where permitted by local licensing authorities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 472, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 347, § 2.

3-7-7.3.
Class B licenses — Restriction on entertainment.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or in the Rhode Island general laws to the contrary, in the case of any city or town that issues any retailer’s Class B license, this city or town may restrict or prohibit entertainment at these licensed facilities, in accordance with objective standards adopted by the municipality and approved by the department of business regulation, provided that any standard shall be applied uniformly to all of these licensed facilities.

The licensing board for the city of Providence is authorized to immediately suspend or revoke the license or exercise other remedies, in accordance with proper due process owed to the licensee, with respect to:

Any Class B licensee that provides entertainment without an entertainment license issued by the city of Providence pursuant to its authority under chapter 22 of title 5; and/or

Any Class B licensee that engages in activities exceeding those permitted by a Class B license, unless such licensee has obtained any additional license permitting such activities, including, but not limited to, a Class N license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 384, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 402, § 2.

3-7-7.4.
Brew on premises license.

A brew on premises license (BOP) authorizes the holder to provide brewing supplies and facilities to the public for the private manufacture of malt beverages on the licensed premises. The BOP license shall not authorize the sale of malt beverage to the general public on the premises nor the consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises. The annual fee for the license shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) for producing more than fifty thousand (50,000) gallons per year and one hundred dollars ($100) per year for producing less than fifty thousand (50,000) gallons per year, prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year and paid to the director of the department of business regulation.

The director of the department of business regulation, the director of the department of health, and the director of the department of environmental management may promulgate rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the purpose of this section, if in the interest of health and safety they are deemed necessary. The director of the department of business regulation shall limit to seven (7) the maximum number of operating facilities issued licenses by the department pursuant to this section.

Any operating facility issued a license pursuant to this section and any individuals using the premises are subject to federal regulations including, but not limited to, 27 CFR 24.75 and 27 CFR 25.205-25.206.

Any facility issued a license pursuant to this section shall, in addition to any federal regulations, comply with the following conditions:

The proprietor of the facility must provide a written notice to the director of the department of business regulation before beginning business. The notice must contain the name and address of the brew on premises facility and the hours when it is open for business. The maximum hours of operation shall be Monday through Saturday, eight o’clock (8:00) a.m. through eleven o’clock (11:00) p.m. and Sunday twelve o’clock (12:00) noon through six o’clock (6:00) p.m., provided, however, bottled beer shall not be removed from the facility on Sundays, and except on Christmas, New Year’s, and Thanksgiving when the facility shall not be open. The notice must be updated in the event of any change in name, address or hours of operation;

The proprietor of the brew on premises facility must keep records relating to all individuals using the facility. Information in these records must include the name, address, age, number of adults residing in the individual’s household, and the quantity of beer produced by each individual during a calendar year. These records may consist of commercial records or invoices, and must be available for inspection by any authorized investigator of this department during the business hours of the facility;

The brew on premises facility shall not provide physical assistance to, or on behalf of, customers in the production or bottling of beer, but may provide advice.

The following activities are examples of providing physical assistance in the production of beer:

Filling of vessels with brewing ingredients;

Mixing of ingredients;

Movement of beer from one vessel or container to another container; and

Filtering and bottling of the final product;

The following activities do not constitute providing physical assistance in the production of beer:

Cleaning, maintenance, and repair of brewing and bottling equipment;

Maintenance of climate and temperature control;

Disposal of spent grains and wastes;

Quality control (including laboratory examination) of beer; and

Preheating of vessels;

The same individual is responsible for brewing, handling or transporting the beer produced and must be at least twenty-one (21) years of age. This individual may produce beer within the prescribed quantity of limitations, shall not transport in excess of twenty (20) gallons of beer produced, and may not sell beer produced. Production of beer for personal use may not be in violation of federal law or regulation or state law or regulation. Beer produced at a brew on premises facility may be removed only for the personal use of the brewer.

The production of beer per household for personal or family use may not exceed:

Two hundred (200) gallons per calendar year if there are two (2) or more adults residing in the household; or

One hundred (100) gallons per calendar year if there is only one adult residing in the household;

Partnerships, corporations, or associations may not use the brew on premises facility and may not produce beer for personal or family use; and

Transportation of brewed beer shall be at the time of bottling. The brew on premises facility shall not allow more than twenty (20) cases (twenty-four (24) twelve (12) ounce bottles) to remain on the premises at any given time.

Any violation of the provisions of this section shall be enforced in accordance with any of the appropriate enforcement provisions contained in this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 367, § 1.

3-7-7.5.
Class B license — The Weekapaug Inn.

Notwithstanding the provisions to the contrary of §

3-7-7

or any other statute, rule, or regulation, the Westerly town council and/or the Westerly licensing board may continue to issue a Class B tavern license to “The Weekapaug Inn” during the period of its renovation when such license might otherwise lapse.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 309, § 1.

3-7-7.6.
Casino license — Class B-C.

A Class B-C license shall be issued only to a holder of a gaming and entertainment license that is authorized to operate twenty-four (24) hours a day.

The license authorizes the holder to keep for sale and sell beverages, including beer in cans, at retail at the place described and to deliver them for consumption on the premises or place where sold. It also authorizes the charging of an admission to events at the gaming and entertainment facility.

The license authorizes the holder to sell and serve alcoholic beverages between the hours of six o’clock (6:00) a.m. and two o’clock (2:00) a.m. on Fridays, Saturdays, and nights before federal and state legally recognized holidays. The fee for a Class B-C license shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

The applicant for a Class B-C license shall submit the following to its host municipality:

The applicant holds a valid and enforceable Class B-V license that is in good standing.

The applicant is a licensed gaming and entertainment establishment that is authorized to operate twenty-four (24) hours a day.

The applicant provides a twenty-four-hour (24) security plan to the chief of police or other appropriate law enforcement official for the host municipality.

The security plan shall set forth a protocol for communication with the host municipality’s police department and for updating the plan, as necessary.

In the event that the host municipality grants a Class B-C license, the licensee shall exchange its existing Class B-V license for the Class B-C license.

Upon receipt of the proper permits from the local licensing board, holders of Class B-C licenses are permitted to have dances, entertainment, and food service within the licensed premises to be conducted during the hours permitted for sale and service of alcoholic beverages.

A holder of a Class B-C license, upon approval of the department of business regulations and the local licensing board, may serve alcoholic beverages as part of an event that may not be specifically set forth in §

3-7-26(c)

. The holder of the Class B-C license must secure approval for any such promotional event first from the department of business regulation liquor control administration and then from the local licensing board upon establishing a specific security protocol for the event.

Notwithstanding any provisions in the department of business regulation liquor control administration regulations, rule 18, it shall be lawful for the holder of a Class B-C license to permit the consumption of alcoholic beverages at any time as long as the subject alcoholic beverage was purchased during legal service hours.

To the extent that there is no conflict with the provisions of §

3-7-7.6

, the provisions of §

3-7-7

shall apply to a holder of a Class B-C license.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 501, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 535, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 44.

3-7-7.7.
Class B license — Smithfield.

Notwithstanding the provisions to the contrary of §

3-7-7

or any other statute, rule, or regulation, the Smithfield town council and/or the Smithfield licensing board may issue a Class B tavern license for the premises shown on the maps of the tax assessor of the town of Smithfield as Lot 7 on Plat 17.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 261, § 1.

3-7-8.
Class C license.

A retailer’s Class C license authorizes the holder of the license to keep for sale and to sell beverages at retail at the place described in the license and to deliver those beverages for consumption on the premises where sold. No beverages shall be sold or served after twelve o’clock (12:00) midnight nor before six o’clock (6:00) a.m., except as provided in subsection (e) herein. Local license boards in the several cities and towns may fix an earlier closing time within their discretion. The license authorizes the holder to keep for sale and sell beverages, including beer in cans, at retail at the place described in the license and to deliver those beverages for consumption on the premises.

The license authorizes the holder to sell pre-packaged foods prepared off the premises with beverages but prohibits the preparation and serving of foods cooked on the premises. The holder of the license may serve with beverages, and without charge, popcorn, crackers, bread, pretzels, sausage of any type, pickles, sardines, smoked herring, lupino beans, and potato chips. No food shall be cooked on the premises but pre-packaged foods prepared and cooked off the premises and purchased by the holder from a supplier may be warmed and sold on the premises in their original packaging, and all foods shall be covered in accordance with the regulations of the state department of health. The annual fee for the license is four hundred dollars ($400) to eight hundred dollars ($800), prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year.

The town councils of the towns of Coventry, Scituate, and South Kingstown are authorized to prohibit by ordinance the issuance of Class C licenses. Upon prohibiting Class C licenses, the license board of the towns of Coventry, Scituate and South Kingstown shall issue Class B licenses to the holder of all Class C licenses in those towns. The Class B licenses may be issued to the holders of Class C licenses notwithstanding any requirements of §

3-7-7

. The holders of Class C licenses shall have the full privileges of a Class B license and shall pay the annual fee provided for Class B licenses.

Notwithstanding any prohibitions on the preparation and serving of foods cooked on the premises contained in paragraph (b) herein, the holders of Class C licenses in the city of Newport are authorized to prepare and serve foods cooked on the premises. The holders of Class C licenses in the city of Newport shall be deemed to be victualling houses for purposes of §

3-8-1

.

Any holder of a Class C license may, upon the approval of the local licensing board and for the additional payment of two hundred dollars ($200), sell or serve beverages on Fridays and Saturdays and the night before legal state holidays until one o’clock (1:00) a.m. All requests for a one o’clock (1:00) a.m. license shall be advertised, at the applicant’s expense, by the local licensing board in a newspaper with a general statewide circulation or having a general circulation in the city or town where the establishment applying for the license is located.

The licensing board for the city of Providence is authorized to immediately suspend or revoke the license or exercise other remedies, in accordance with proper due process owed to the licensee, with respect to:

Any Class C licensee that provides entertainment without an entertainment license issued by the city of Providence pursuant to its authority under chapter 22 of title 5; and/or

Any Class C licensee that engages in activities exceeding those permitted by a Class C license, unless such licensee has obtained any additional license permitting such activities, including, but not limited to, a Class N license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; P.L. 1936, ch. 2315, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; P.L. 1955, ch. 3454, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-8

; P.L. 1969, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 400, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 404, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 429, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 7, § 11; P.L. 2006, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 470, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 384, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 402, § 2.

3-7-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 27; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-9

); Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 251, § 1.

3-7-10.
Doors from Class C licensed premises to other structures — Sale to unlicensed dealer or house of ill fame.

If at the time of or after the issue of any Class C license, the place licensed shall have an opening from within the licensed place into any other part of the same structure or into any adjoining structure, the license shall be void. A sale, by any person holding any class of license under the provisions of this title, of any beverage to an unlicensed dealer in any beverage or to any owner or keeper of any house of ill fame, with reason to believe that the beverage is to be resold, shall be sufficient cause for the revocation of the license. The holder shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or both. Any person whose license is revoked is disqualified from holding any license of any kind under the provisions of this title for the period of five (5) years following the date of the revocation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 3004, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-10

.

3-7-11.
Class D license.

A retailer’s Class D license shall be issued only to a club or to any corporation organized prior to the year 1900 for purposes similar to those set forth in chapter 6 of title 7, and which has held a Class D license for at least ten (10) consecutive years prior to July 1, 1993, and authorizes the holder of the license to keep for sale and to sell beverages at the place described at retail and to deliver those beverages for consumption on the premises where sold. The license authorizes the holder of the license to keep for sale and sell beverages, including beer in cans, at retail at the place described and to deliver those beverages for consumption on the premises. If a club is not the owner or, for the period of two (2) years before the filing of its application for a license, the lessee of the premises where its principal activities are carried on or of kitchen and dining room equipment in the club premises reasonably adequate to supply its members and guests with food, then the license shall authorize the holder of the license to keep for sale and sell malt and vinous beverages, but not beverages consisting in whole or in part of alcohol produced by distillation. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, with the written permission of the local authority, the licensee may supply food and beverage to the public for consumption on the premises at times determined by the holder of the license. The annual fee for the license to sell beverages shall be not more than eight hundred dollars ($800) and for the license to sell malt and vinous beverages only shall be not more than four hundred dollars ($400), in each case prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year determined by each local municipality; provided, further, a municipality may establish separate and lower annual fees for Class D licenses for veterans’ halls with a capacity of not more than one hundred (100) persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-11

; P.L. 1967, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 7, § 11; P.L. 2004, ch. 536, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 17, § 1.

3-7-11.1.
Golf courses — Sale of alcoholic beverages.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

3-7-11

, a club possessing a Class D or B-V (a class B license holder operating as a victualer) license and operating a golf course may, in addition to the place described in such license, be authorized to sell alcoholic beverages to its members and guests from mobile wagons or carts for consumption on the golf course; provided that all such sales must be made within the confines of the golf course.

If the golf course shall be located in more than one contiguous city or town, then the other city or town, i.e. other than the one issuing the Class D or B-V license, may, upon application by the golf club, issue a Class D or B-V ancillary license, which shall permit sales from mobile wagons or carts upon that portion of the golf course located within the other city or town. Any violation of the provisions of title 3 will be prosecuted in the city or town where the violation occurred. The annual fee for such ancillary license shall be not more than four hundred dollars ($400) prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year determined by each local municipality.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 210, § 1.

3-7-12.
Information as to club affairs.

Every club on demand of the department shall file with it a list of the names and addresses of its members, directors, officers, agents and employees and any other information with respect to its affairs that the department shall require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 50; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-12

.

3-7-13.
Class E license.

A retailer’s Class E license authorizes a person entitled to retail, compound, and dispense medicines and poisons to keep for sale and to sell at the place described in the license, beverages not to exceed one quart each for medicinal purposes and only upon the prescription of a licensed practicing physician. The license shall not authorize the doing of any act in violation of any law of the United States. The annual fee for the license is ten dollars ($10.00) to two hundred dollars ($200).

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2373, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-13

; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 7, § 11; P.L. 2004, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 410, § 1.

3-7-14.
Class F license.

A retailer’s Class F license authorizes the holder of the license to keep for sale and to sell malt and vinous beverages on the premises, described in the license, at retail for consumption on the premises where sold for a period of nineteen (19) hours, including Sunday. The license may be issued to religious organizations, state corporations, limited-liability companies (LLCs), sole proprietorships, and political organizations only and the sale of malt and vinous beverages may take place between the hours of six o’clock (6:00) a.m. and one o’clock (1:00) a.m. on the following day, provided that no more than twelve (12) licenses shall be issued to any organization, corporation, LLC, sole proprietorship, or political organization in any one calendar year; and provided further that, as to each such entity, this limit of twelve (12) licenses per calendar year shall apply collectively to the entity and its officers, directors, principals, affiliates, employees, and agents. Class F licenses shall not be granted to any person or entity holding any other liquor license. The fee for each retailer’s Class F license is fifteen dollars ($15.00).

The issuing authority may, in its discretion, permit applicants to file a single annual application for issuance of up to twelve (12) event licenses for a calendar year and the authority may issue the licenses concurrently; provided that, each event license shall state the specific event date with which it is associated; and provided further that, the applicant shall pay the collective amount of the event license fees, fifteen dollars ($15.00) multiplied by the number of licenses issued, at the time of issuance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-14

; P.L. 1975, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 135, § 1.

3-7-14.1.
Class F-1 license.

A retailer’s Class F-1 license authorizes the holder of the license to keep for sale and to sell alcoholic beverages on the premises, described in the license, at retail for consumption on the premises where sold for a period of nineteen (19) hours, including Sunday. The license may be issued to religious organizations, state corporations, limited-liability companies (LLCs), sole proprietorships, and political organizations only and the sale of beverages may take place between the hours of six o’clock (6:00) a.m. and one o’clock (1:00) a.m. on the following day; provided that, no more than twelve (12) licenses shall be issued to any organization, corporation, LLC, sole proprietorship, or political organization in any one calendar year; and provided further, that as to each such entity, this limit of twelve (12) licenses per calendar year shall apply collectively to the entity and its officers, directors, principals, affiliates, employees, and agents. Class F-1 licenses shall not be granted to any person or entity holding any other liquor license.

The fee for the license is thirty-five dollars ($35.00.)

The issuing authority may, in its discretion, permit applicants to file a single annual application for issuance of up to twelve (12) event licenses for a calendar year and the authority may issue the licenses concurrently; provided that, each event license shall state the specific event date with which it is associated; and provided further that, the applicant shall pay the collective amount of the event license fees, thirty-five dollars ($35.00) multiplied by the number of licenses issued, at the time of issuance.

Class F and F-1 license holders shall purchase alcohol for resale from Class A license holders only.

History of Section.

G.L., §

3-7-14.1

; P.L. 1975, ch. 113, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 135, § 1.

3-7-14.2.
Class P licenses — Caterers.

A caterer licensed by the department of health and the division of taxation shall be eligible to apply for a Class P license from the department of business regulation. The department of business regulation is authorized to issue all caterers’ licenses. The license will be valid throughout this state as a state license and no further license will be required or tax imposed by any city or town upon this alcoholic beverage privilege. Each caterer to which the license is issued shall pay to the department of business regulation an annual fee of five hundred dollars ($500) for the license, which fees are paid into the state treasury. The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this license. In promulgating said rules, the department shall include, but is not limited to, the following standards:

Proper identification will be required for individuals who look thirty (30) years old or younger and who are ordering alcoholic beverages;

Only valid ID’s as defined by these titles are acceptable;

An individual may not be served more than two (2) drinks at a time;

Licensees, their agents, or employees will not serve visibly intoxicated individuals;

Licensees may only serve alcoholic beverages for no more than a five-hour (5) period per event;

Only a licensee, or its employees, may serve alcoholic beverages at the event;

The licensee will deliver and remove alcoholic beverages to the event; and

No shots or triple alcoholic drinks will be served.

Any bartender employed by the licensee shall be certified by a nationally recognized alcohol beverage server training program.

The licensee shall purchase at retail all alcoholic beverages from a licensed Class A alcohol retail establishment located in the state, provided, however, any licensee who also holds a Class B license, issued pursuant to the provisions of §

3-7-7

, shall be allowed to purchase alcoholic beverages at wholesale. Any person violating this section shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) for this violation and shall be subject to license revocation. The provisions of this section shall be enforced in accordance with this title.

Violation of subsection (a) of this section is punishable upon conviction by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). Fines imposed under this section shall be paid to the department of business regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 242, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.